Illinois, session 104th, SB2454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5adding Section 10.20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/10.20 new)7    Sec. 10.20. Local regulation of State facilities.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no 9ordinance of a unit of local government shall be enforced 10against the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or 11installation of a State facility. A unit of local government 12shall not require payment of permitting fees or require permit 13inspections for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, 14or installation of any State facility. 15    (b) The Board shall, to the fullest extent practicable, 16coordinate with local utilities regarding utility connection 17requirements and procedures. 18    (c) Before undertaking any activity involving the 19construction, reconstruction, improvement, or installation of 20any State facility, the Board shall, to the fullest extent 21practicable, coordinate and consult with the units of local 22government that are responsible for providing fire protection 23services to that State facility in order to ensure that fire   SB2454- 2 -LRB104 11049 HLH 21131 b1protection services can be provided by the unit of local 2government to the State facility in the most effective manner. 3    (d) Nothing in this Section shall relieve the Board from 4compliance with any State or federal mandate. This Section 5does not relieve the Board from the obligation to compensate 6units of local governments for fair and reasonable connection 7or impact costs that (i) conform to industry standards or (ii) 8are consistent with similar costs that are applied to private, 9non-governmental capital projects. 10    (e) This Section applies to the construction, 11reconstruction, improvement and installation of State 12facilities that is ongoing on the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and to all 14projects that begin on or after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 16    (f) A home rule unit may not regulate the construction, 17reconstruction, improvement, or installation of a State 18facility in a manner that is inconsistent with this Section. 19This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 20of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 21exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 22by the State. 23    (g) As used in this Section:24    "Fair and reasonable connection or impact costs" means 25demonstrated costs incurred by the unit of local government 26that directly result from the Board's use of or impact on local   SB2454- 3 -LRB104 11049 HLH 21131 b1infrastructure. 2    "State facility" means any capital project under the 3authority of the Capital Development Board.